Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Chapter 11. Energy Conservation in Public Buildings
[Repealed]

§§ 29-11-1 through 29-11-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 8, from and after July 1, 1979.

§29-11-1. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 1]

§29-11-3. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 2]

§29-11-5. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 3]

§29-11-7. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 4]

§29-11-9. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 5]

§29-11-11. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 6]

§29-11-13. [En, Laws, 1978, ch. 523, § 7]